Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2703
Cities and villages; prosecution of complaints; ordinances; file with court.

Any city or village attorney may sign and prosecute complaints in the county court for any violation of any ordinance of the city or village for which he or she is attorney.

After January 1, 1974, no city or village may prosecute complaints for violations of ordinances unless such city or village has on file with the court a current copy of the ordinances of such city or village. Subject to guidelines provided by the State Court Administrator, the court shall prescribe the form in which such ordinances shall be filed.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 33;

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 8;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-533.